Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2402
Restricted parking lot; signs designating.

Signs designating a restricted parking lot shall be readily visible and shall state the purpose or purposes for parking on the restricted parking lot, state the hours for restricted parking, and state who to contact for information regarding a towed vehicle.

Laws 1979, LB 348, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 47, § 3.